Utah statutes.
78B-6-1104.   Agricultural operations -- Nuisance liability.
(1)  Activities conducted in the normal and ordinary course of agricultural
operations or conducted in accordance with sound agricultural practices are
presumed to be reasonable and not constitute a nuisance.
(2)  Agricultural operations undertaken in conformity with federal, state, and
local laws and regulations, including zoning ordinances, are presumed to be
operating within sound agricultural practices.
